Illinois, session 104th, SB1544.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.25 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)7    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 8except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire 9rifle, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as provided by 10administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during the open 11season of not more than 14 days which will be set annually by 12the Director between the dates of November 1st and December 1331st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only season 14between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 15purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 16limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 17or revolver and centerfire rifles that are single shot. The 18only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 19bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 20a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 21straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger, 22both of which must be available as a factory load with the 23published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a   SB1544- 2 -LRB104 08608 BDA 18660 b1capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 2The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 3jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.4    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 5management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 6arrow season.7    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 8with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 9set annually by the Director between the dates of September 101st and January 31st, both inclusive.11    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 12with (i) a muzzleloading rifle or (ii) bow and arrow during the 13open season for muzzleloading rifles set annually by the 14Director.15    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 16forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 17possession limits and those counties of the State where open 18seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 19Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.20    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 21the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 22found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 23or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 24announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 25shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.26    The Department is authorized to establish a separate   SB1544- 3 -LRB104 08608 BDA 18660 b1harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 2purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 3the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 4season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 5and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 6February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 7announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 8shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 9The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 10regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to 11management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 12program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 13that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 14to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 15held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 16issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 17the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 18program. 19    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 20the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 21providing information regarding deer management programs 22established by the Code or by administrative rule that 23includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 24separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 25communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 26happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season.   SB1544- 4 -LRB104 08608 BDA 18660 b1    Any deer herd management plan established by the 2Department, including length of seasons and bag and possession 3limits, shall take into account economic damage and public 4safety concerns caused by deer.5(Source: P.A. 101-66, eff. 7-12-19; 102-314, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-932, eff. 1-1-23.)